Utah statutes.
78B-1-152.   Witnesses -- Prohibition of expert witness contingent fees in
civil actions.
(1)  As used in this section, "contingent fee agreement" means an agreement
for the provision of testimony or other evidence and related services by an
expert witness in a civil action that specifies:
(a)  the payment of compensation to the expert witness for the testimony,
other evidence, and services is contingent, in whole or in part, upon a
judgment being rendered in favor of the plaintiff or defendant in a civil
action, upon a favorable settlement being obtained by the plaintiff or
defendant in a civil action, or upon the plaintiff in a civil action being
awarded in a judgment or settlement damages in at least a specified amount;
and
(b)  upon satisfaction of the contingency described in Subsection (1)(a), the
compensation to be paid to the expert witness is in a fixed amount or an
amount to be determined by a specified formula, including, but not limited to,
a percentage of a judgment rendered in favor of the plaintiff or a percentage
of a favorable settlement obtained by the plaintiff.
(2)  A plaintiff or defendant in a civil action may not engage an expert
witness by means of a contingent fee agreement unless approval is sought and
received from the court.
(3)  An expert witness may be engaged by the plaintiff or defendant on the
contingency that the expert actually qualify as an expert.  Once the witness
is qualified as an expert Subsection (2) applies to his continued
participation in the action.
